Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-629
Petitions; signer; qualification; exceptions; circulator; qualification.

For any petition prepared or filed pursuant to the Election Act:

(1) Each petition signer shall be a registered voter and qualified to sign a petition at the time of signing a petition, except that a signer of a petition for President of the United States, a candidate petition, a new political party petition, or an initiative or referendum petition under sections 32-1401 to 32-1409 shall be a registered voter of the State of Nebraska on or before the date on which the petition is filed with the filing officer; and

(2) Only a person who is at least eighteen years of age shall qualify as a valid circulator of a petition and may circulate petitions. Petition circulators shall comply with section 32-630.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 197;

Laws 2003, LB 444, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB39, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB759, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 52.